Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-8,143
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-8,143 to 79-8,145 shall be known and may be cited as the Alternative Certification for Quality Teachers Act.

Laws 2021, LB528, § 29.